Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
ANIMAL DISEASES AND QUARANTINE

§142-1 Information and statistics. The
department of agriculture shall gather, compile, and tabulate, from time to
time information and statistics concerning domestic animals in the State, their
protection and use, inquire into and report upon the causes of contagious,
infectious and communicable diseases among them, and the means for the
prevention, suppression, and cure of the same. [L 1905, c 82, pt of §4; RL
1925, §607; RL 1935, §202; am L 1941, c 228, §2; RL 1945, §1051; RL 1955,
§20-1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §142-1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next